Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2661.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97C.315, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Lines. An angler may not use more than one line, except that: (1) two lines may be used to take fish through the ice; (2) the commissioner may, by rule, authorize the use of two lines in areas designated by the commissioner in Lake Superior; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (3) two lines may be used in the Minnesota River downstream of the Granite Falls Damdeleted text begin and in the Mississippi River downstream of St. Anthony Fallsdeleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (4) three lines may be used in the Mississippi River and the St. Croix Rivernew text end .